Utah statutes.
57-8-26.   Waiver of use of common areas and facilities -- Abandonment of unit.

No unit owner may exempt himself from liability for his contribution towards the common expenses by waiver of the use or enjoyment of any of the common areas and facilities or by abandonment of his unit.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 1963 General Session

